District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-318.01a

Mayoral budget submission required; consistency of budget submission with previous fiscal year spending.

[Repealed].

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 72, 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 131(b), 56 DCR 1117
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7022(b), 62 DCR 10905

History

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in the section designation.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 15-205, §§ 1041-1043, see § 7012(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 7012(b) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Emergency Legislation

Short title of subtitle E of title I of Law 15-205: Section 1041 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle E of title I of the act may be cited as the Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Submission Act of 2004.

Short Title

Section 1042(a) of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “For each fiscal year, the Mayor shall submit a budget to the Council of which the local funds shall be consistent with the amount projected in spending for the previous fiscal year by the Council in the Council Committee of the Whole report on the Budget Request Act.”

Section 1042 of D.C. Law 15-205 was repealed by D.C. Law 21-36, § 7022(a).

Editor's Notes